Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB754.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Hospital Closure Procedure and Notification Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Closure plan." A detailed plan for a general hospital closure or a significant impact closure as required under this act."Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."General hospital closure." The closure of all or a majority 123456789101112131415161718 of the units or departments of a hospital."Health equity impact assessment." A report that provides data metrics on a hospital as required under section 7."Hospital." As defined in 28 Pa. Code § 101.4 (relating to definitions)."Hospital authority." A hospital's parent company or governing body or a similar authority that oversees the hospital's operations and a closure plan."Significant impact closure." The closure of an emergency treatment unit or department of a hospital, a labor and delivery unit or department of a hospital or any other type of unit or department of a hospital, which the department determines, by regulation under section 10, significantly impacts the health and welfare of an affected community.Section 3. Hospital closure procedure requirements.(a) Prohibition.--A hospital authority may not engage in a general hospital closure or significant impact closure unless the hospital has adopted a closure plan that has been approved by the Office of Attorney General and either the department or the county or municipal health department.(b) Approval process.--The Office of Attorney General and either the department or the county or municipal health department may not approve a closure plan unless the Office of Attorney General and either the department or the county or municipal health department determines that continuity of patient care and the health and safety needs of the affected community have been adequately addressed in the closure plan. The Office of Attorney General and either the department or the county or municipal health department may provide a conditional approval of the closure plan based on the hospital authority 20250SB0754PN0813 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 entering into an agreement with the Office of Attorney General and either the department or the county or municipal health department to meet the requirements under this act.Section 4. Notice of proposed general hospital closure or significant impact closure.No later than 180 days before engaging in a general hospital closure or significant impact closure, a hospital authority shall submit a notice of the closure plan to the Office of Attorney General and either the department or the county or municipal health department.Section 5. Public hearings.(a) Hearings.--Before engaging in a general hospital closure or significant impact closure, a hospital authority shall hold a minimum of two public hearings in the affected community. The hospital authority shall hold one public hearing no later than 60 days after submitting the notice under section 4. The hospital authority shall hold a second public hearing no later than 120 days after submitting the notice under section 4.(b) Advertisements.--A hospital authority shall provide a notice of each public hearing under subsection (a) by advertising each public hearing in a newspaper of general circulation within the impacted county, including the time and place of each public hearing and other relevant information. The hospital authority shall advertise each public hearing no earlier than 60 days before the date of the public hearing and no later than 10 days before the date of the public hearing.(c) Hearing information.--No later than 10 days before the date of each public hearing under subsection (a), a hospital authority shall make any relevant information, including handouts, about each public hearing available via a publicly 20250SB0754PN0813 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accessible Internet website.(d) Attendance.--The Office of Attorney General and either the department or the county or municipal health department may require hospital executive staff and administrators to attend a public hearing under subsection (a) and engage in discussions at the public hearing, including discussions regarding relevant information and documents, the closure plan and compliance with the closure plan.Section 6. Public comment period.(a) Comments.--In each advertisement under section 5(b), a hospital authority shall include contact information for the solicitation of public comments on the closure plan, including all of the following:(1) A toll-free telephone number for sharing public comments.(2) A publicly accessible Internet website for sharing public comments.(b) Review.--A hospital authority shall collect and transcribe the public comments received under subsection (a), make the public comments available on the publicly accessible Internet website under subsection (a)(2) and provide a transcript of the public comments to the Office of Attorney General and either the department or the county or municipal health department no later than 30 days before engaging a general hospital closure or significant impact closure.(c) Comment period.--A hospital authority shall provide a public comment period on the closure plan of no less than 60 days before engaging in a general hospital closure or significant impact closure.Section 7. Health equity impact assessments.20250SB0754PN0813 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Submission.--No later than 80 days before engaging in a general hospital closure or significant impact closure, a hospital authority shall submit a health equity impact assessment to the Office of Attorney General and either the department or the county or municipal health department. The hospital authority shall include all of the following information in the health equity impact assessment:(1) The estimated number of patients gaining or losing access to health care services at the hospital due to the general hospital closure or significant impact closure.(2) The estimated number of low-income, senior, minority and Medicare and medical assistance eligible patients gaining or losing access to health care services due to the general hospital closure or significant impact closure.(3) The names and addresses of the three nearest hospitals that provide comparable services, including whether or not each hospital is a medical assistance provider.(4) A summary of the public and private transit options to the hospitals specified under paragraph (3), including estimated drive times.(5) The number of hospital beds gained or eliminated due to the general hospital closure or significant impact closure.(6) A summary of the gained or eliminated health care services due to the general hospital closure or significant impact closure.(7) The number of jobs that will be created or lost due to the general hospital closure or significant impact closure.(8) The estimated fiscal impact on the affected 20250SB0754PN0813 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 community due to the general hospital closure or significant impact closure.(9) The estimated fiscal impact on the hospital authority due to the general hospital closure or significant impact closure.(b) Forms.--The department shall develop a default form for use by a hospital authority to submit on a health equity impact assessment under subsection (a) and make the form available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 8. Closure plans.(a) Initial plan.--No later than 120 days before engaging in a general hospital closure or significant impact closure, a hospital authority shall submit an initial closure plan to the Office of Attorney General and either the department or the county or municipal health department.(b) Updates.--After submitting the initial closure plan under subsection (a), a hospital authority shall provide updates on the implementation of the closure plan to the Office of Attorney General and either the department or the county or municipal health department every 14 days until the date when the general hospital closure or significant impact closure is completed.(c) Contents.--A hospital authority shall include all of the following information in a closure plan:(1) The reason for the general hospital closure or significant impact closure.(2) Strategies regarding the continuity of patient care in each department and unit of the hospital and the transfer of patients to other health care facilities.(3) Strategies regarding specialized programs or groups 20250SB0754PN0813 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of patients particularly vulnerable to interruptions in medical care, including cancer chemotherapy or prenatal care.(4) Strategies for the closure of the emergency department of the hospital, including diversion to other hospital emergency departments and the interface with emergency medical services.(5) Written agreements with other health care providers to accept responsibility for continuing the care of patients receiving ongoing care at the hospital.(6) Strategies for how all medical records, including paper and electronic records, will be maintained throughout and after the general hospital closure or significant impact closure, and how the medical records will be made available to former patients and the physicians who provide care for the patients.(7) Strategies for the maintenance, transfer and disposal of pharmaceuticals, chemicals, hazardous substances and other similar materials located at the hospital.(8) The anticipated timeline for the closing of each department or unit of the hospital.(9) A communications and engagement plan regarding the affected community, including holding public meetings in the affected community.(10) Any changes to the administration and medical staff of the hospital authority during the implementation of the closure plan.(11) Strategies regarding the hospital authority's efforts to assist affected employees and students with finding suitable employment and educational opportunities.(12) Strategies regarding the hospital authority's 20250SB0754PN0813 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 efforts to assist affected employees with maintaining health insurance and to address the impact of collective bargaining for represented employees.(13) Strategies for maintaining hospital security.(14) Strategies for supervising compliance with the closure plan, including updates to the closure plan under subsection (b).Section 9. Enforcement actions.(a) Actions.--If the Office of Attorney General or either the department or the county or municipal health department determines that a hospital has violated the provisions of this act, the Attorney General or a district attorney may initiate a civil action to enforce the provisions of this act.(b) Remedies.--If a court of competent jurisdiction finds that a hospital has failed to comply with any of the provisions of this act, the court may:(1) enjoin the hospital authority from taking any measure to engage a general hospital closure or significant impact closure until the hospital authority complies with the provisions of this act;(2) appoint a special master or temporary manager to ensure that the hospital authority complies with the provisions of this act; or(3) grant any other remedy as the court deems just, proper and equitable under the circumstances.Section 10. Regulations.The Office of Attorney General, in consultation with the department, shall promulgate regulations necessary to effectuate this act.Section 11. Construction.20250SB0754PN0813 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Nothing in this act shall be construed to require the Commonwealth or a municipality, including an official or employee of the Commonwealth or municipality, to relieve, discharge, perform, indemnify or assume liability for any obligation or duty belonging to a hospital or the hospital's officers, directors or affiliates.Section 12. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 30 days.20250SB0754PN0813 - 9 - 12345678